Illinois, session 104th, HB4594.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-25 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 801/1-25)7    Sec. 1-25. Illinois State Museum. In addition to its other 8powers and duties, the Department shall have the following 9powers and duties which shall be performed by the State 10Museum:11        (1) To investigate and study the natural resources and 12    histories of the State and to prepare printed reports and 13    furnish information fundamental to the conservation and 14    development of natural resources, and, for that purpose 15    and for the purpose of upholding federal requirements 16    under the Native American Grave Protection and 17    Repatriation Act, the officers and employees thereof may, 18    pursuant to rule adopted by the Department, enter and 19    cross all lands in this State, doing no damage to private 20    property.21        (2) To cooperate with and advise departments having 22    administrative powers and duties relating to the natural 23    resources of the State, and to cooperate with similar   HB4594- 2 -LRB104 17972 TRT 31409 b1    departments in other states, with tribal nations, and with 2    the United States Government.3        (3) To cooperate with the Illinois State Academy of 4    Science and to publish a suitable number of the results of 5    the investigations and research in the field of natural 6    science to the end that the same may be distributed to the 7    interested public. This cooperation shall not grant any 8    special rights, authority, or privileges to the Academy. 9        (4) To maintain a State Museum, and to collect and 10    preserve objects of scientific, historic, and artistic 11    value, representing past and present fauna and flora, the 12    life and work of humankind, geological history, natural 13    resources, and the manufacturing and fine arts; to welcome 14    visitors of all ages to the State Museum; and to interpret 15    for and educate the public concerning the foregoing. The 16    State Museum shall work with Native Americans to create an 17    interpretation of Native American histories and art 18    directed by tribal partners. 19        (5) At the sole discretion of the Department, the 20    State Museum may cooperate with the Illinois State Museum 21    Society for the benefit of the State Museum. This 22    cooperation shall not grant any special rights, authority, 23    or privileges to the Society. Upon the recommendation of 24    the State Museum Director with the approval of the 25    Director of the Department, the State Museum may enter 26    into agreements with the Society for the operation of a   HB4594- 3 -LRB104 17972 TRT 31409 b1    sales counter and other concessions for the benefit of the 2    State Museum and the Society. The State Museum may enter 3    into agreements with the Society for programs at or 4    outside the State Museum. The Society shall be solely 5    responsible for its own budget and the preparation of the 6    budget, its staff, its equipment, its supplies, and its 7    programs. 8        (6) To accept grants of property and to hold property 9    to be administered as part of the State Museum for the 10    purpose of preservation, research of interpretation of 11    significant areas within the State for the purpose of 12    preserving, studying, and interpreting history and 13    archaeological and natural phenomena and for the purpose 14    of upholding Native American Grave Protection and 15    Repatriation Act requirements.16        (7) To contribute to and support the operations, 17    programs and capital development of public museums in this 18    State. For the purposes of this Section, "public museum" 19    means a facility: (A) that is operating for the purposes 20    of promoting cultural development through special 21    activities or programs or through performing arts that are 22    performed in an indoor setting, and acquiring, conserving, 23    preserving, studying, interpreting, enhancing, and in 24    particular, organizing and continuously exhibiting 25    specimens, artifacts, articles, documents and other things 26    of historical, anthropological, archaeological,   HB4594- 4 -LRB104 17972 TRT 31409 b1    industrial, scientific or artistic import, to the public 2    for its instruction and enjoyment, and (B) that either (i) 3    is operated by or located upon land owned by a unit of 4    local government or (ii) is a museum that has an annual 5    attendance of at least 150,000 and offers educational 6    programs to school groups during school hours. A museum is 7    eligible to receive funds for capital development under 8    this subdivision (7) only if it is operated by or located 9    upon land owned by a unit of local government or if it is 10    certified by a unit of local government in which it is 11    located as a public museum meeting the criteria of this 12    Section. Recipients of funds for capital development under 13    this subdivision (7) shall match State funds with local or 14    private funding according to the following:15            (a) for a public museum with an attendance of 16        300,000 or less during the preceding calendar year, no 17        match is required;18            (b) for a public museum with an attendance of over 19        300,000 but less than 600,000 during the preceding 20        calendar year, the match must be at a ratio of $1 from 21        local and private funds for every $1 in State funds; 22        and23            (c) for a public museum with an attendance of over 24        600,000 during the preceding calendar year, the match 25        must be at a ratio of $2 from local and private funds 26        for every $1 in State funds.  HB4594- 5 -LRB104 17972 TRT 31409 b1        The Department shall formulate rules and regulations 2    relating to the allocation of any funds appropriated by 3    the General Assembly for the purpose of contributing to 4    the support of public museums in this State.5        (8) To perform all other duties and assume all 6    obligations of the former Department of Energy and Natural 7    Resources and the former Department of Registration and 8    Education pertaining to the State Museum.9        (9) To work in collaboration with the Division of 10    Historic Preservation of the Department in the exercise of 11    all the rights, powers, and duties conferred upon the 12    Department under the Historic Preservation Act. 13(Source: P.A. 102-1005, eff. 5-27-22; 103-835, eff. 8-9-24.)